Washington statutes.
RCW 26.09.470

Failure to give notice.

(1) The failure to provide the required notice is grounds for sanctions, including contempt if applicable.

(2) In determining whether a person has failed to comply with the notice requirements for the purposes of this section, the court may consider whether:

(a) The person has substantially complied with the notice requirements;

(b) The court order in effect at the time of the relocation was issued prior to June 8, 2000, and the person substantially complied with the notice requirements, if any, in the existing order;

(c) A waiver of notice was granted;

(d) A person entitled to receive notice was substantially harmed; and

(e) Any other factor the court deems relevant.

(3) A person entitled to file an objection to the intended relocation of the child may file such objection whether or not the person has received proper notice.

[ 2000 c 21 s 9.]

NOTES:

Intent—Captions not law—2000 c 21: See notes following RCW 26.09.405.